Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Kids In Need Foundation. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Kids In Need Foundation for programs and activities that decrease absenteeism, encourage school engagement and interest in learning, improve student grades, and improve student graduation rates: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) The grant must be used to support Minnesota schools in which at least half of enrolled students qualify for free or reduced-price meals, with a focus on low-income students and students of color. Eligible uses of the grant include: new text end new text begin (1) providing educational supplies to support the Kids In Need Foundation Rural and Indigenous School Equity program; new text end new text begin (2) increasing access to the Kids In Need Foundation Teacher Resource Center and training facility; new text end new text begin (3) enhancing volunteer space; and new text end new text begin (4) supporting additional supply distributions to teachers and students. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to ... percent of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin (d) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end